Tennessee, session 114, SB1849.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 5-1-127(b), is amended by deleting
the language "three (3)" and substituting instead "two (2)".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1849
010943
- 1 -